Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1503
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Disabled Persons and Family Support Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Disabled family member or disabled person means a person who has a medically determinable severe, chronic disability which:

(a) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments;

(b) Is likely to continue indefinitely;

(c) Results in substantial functional limitations in two or more of the following areas of major life activity: (i) Self-care, (ii) receptive and expressive language, (iii) learning, (iv) mobility, (v) self-direction, (vi) capacity for independent living, (vii) work skills or work tolerance, and (viii) economic sufficiency; and

(d) Reflects the person's need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, vocational rehabilitation, or other services which are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated; and

(3) Other support programs means all forms of local, state, or federal assistance, grants-in-aid, educational programs, or support provided by public or private funds for disabled persons or their families.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 354;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 72;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 286.